Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 4

Distributions

48-16-401. Distributions to shareholders.

A board of directors may authorize and the corporation may make distributions to its shareholders subject to restriction by the charter and the limitation in subsection (c).

If the board of directors does not fix the record date for determining shareholders entitled to a distribution (other than one involving a repurchase or reacquisition of shares), it is the date the board of directors authorizes the distribution.

No distribution may be made if, after giving it effect:

The corporation would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of business; or

The corporation's total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus (unless the charter permits otherwise) the amount that would be needed, if the corporation were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution of shareholders whose preferential rights are superior to those receiving the distribution.

The board of directors may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (c) either on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances.

Except as provided in subsection (g), the effect of a distribution under subsection (c) is measured:

In the case of distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of the corporation's shares, as of the earlier of:

The date money or other property is transferred or debt incurred by the corporation; or

The date the shareholder ceases to be a shareholder with respect to the acquired shares;

In the case of any other distribution of indebtedness or distribution through the incurrence of indebtedness, as of the date the indebtedness is distributed or incurred. In a case in which the incurrence of indebtedness is the granting of a mortgage, security interest, lien, or other encumbrance of the corporation's assets, the indebtedness shall be deemed to be incurred on the date of the execution and delivery of the security instrument granting such mortgage, security interest, lien, or other encumbrance; and

In all other cases, as of:

The date the distribution is authorized if the payment occurs within four (4) months after the date of authorization; or

The date the payment is made if it occurs more than four (4) months after the date of authorization.

A corporation's indebtedness to a shareholder incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the corporation's indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors except to the extent subordinated by agreement.

Indebtedness of a corporation, including indebtedness issued as a distribution, is not considered a liability for purposes of determinations under subsection (c) if its terms provide that payment of principal and interest are to be made only if and to the extent that payment of a distribution to shareholders could then be made under this section. If the indebtedness referred to in the preceding sentence is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is actually made.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.40; 1989, ch. 451, § 9; 1994, ch. 776, §§ 19, 20.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1114, 5-1202.